West Virginia, session 2025, HB2290.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Department of Agriculture. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 29, 2024, authorized under the authority of §19-1-11 of this code, relating to the Department of Agriculture (Rural Rehabilitation Program, 61 CSR 33), is authorized.